Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.220

Commute trip reduction—Parking revenue—Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.

(1) "Guaranteed ride home" means an assured ride home for commuters participating in a commute trip reduction program who are not able to use their normal commute mode because of personal emergencies.

(2) "Pledged" means parking revenue designated through any means, including moneys received from the natural resource building, which is used for the debt service payment of bonds issued for parking facilities.

[ 1993 c 394 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—1993 c 394: "The legislature finds that reducing the number of commute trips to work is an effective way of reducing automobile-related air pollution, traffic congestion, and energy use. The legislature intends that state agencies shall assume a leadership role in implementing programs to reduce vehicle miles traveled and single-occupant vehicle commuting, under RCW 70.94.521 through 70.94.551.

The legislature has established and directed an interagency task force to consider mechanisms for funding state agency commute trip reduction programs; and to consider and recommend policies for employee incentives for commuting by other than single-occupant vehicles, and policies for the use of state-owned vehicles.

It is the purpose of this act to provide state agencies with the authority to provide employee incentives, including subsidies for use of high occupancy vehicles to meet commute trip reduction goals, and to remove existing statutory barriers for state agencies to use public funds, including parking revenue, to operate, maintain, lease, or construct parking facilities at state-owned and leased facilities, to reduce parking subsidies, and to support commute trip reduction programs." [ 1993 c 394 s 1.]